Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 4. County Administrator

§ 19-4-1.
Employment, qualifications and general duties.

[With regard to any county that is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized, in its discretion, to employ a county administrator. The person employed as county administrator shall hold at least a bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university and shall have knowledgeable experience in any of the following fields: work projection, budget planning, accounting, purchasing, cost control, personnel management and road construction procedures. Such administrator, under the policies determined by the board of supervisors and subject to said board’s general supervision and control, shall administer all county affairs falling under the control of the board and carry out the general policies of the board in conformity with the estimates of expenditures fixed in the annual budget as finally adopted by the board or as thereafter revised by appropriate action of the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 6, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-4-1.
Employment, qualifications and general duties.

[With regard to any county that is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors of each county shall appoint some person other than a member of such board to serve as county administrator. The board of supervisors may appoint the chancery clerk of the county as county administrator if the chancery clerk agrees to serve as county administrator, or the board may appoint as county administrator some other person who has knowledgeable experience in any of the following fields: work projection, budget planning, accounting, purchasing, cost control or personnel management. If the chancery clerk is appointed to serve as county administrator, the board of supervisors, with the approval of the chancery clerk, may appoint the chancery clerk also to serve as the county purchase clerk, an assistant purchase clerk, the inventory control clerk or any combination of such positions, but no chancery clerk who serves as county administrator shall also serve as the county road manager or a receiving clerk or an assistant receiving clerk for the county. If some person other than the chancery clerk is appointed to serve as county administrator, the board of supervisors may appoint such person also to serve as (a) inventory control clerk; (b) inventory control clerk and county road manager; or (c) inventory control clerk and county purchase clerk; but such person shall not serve as both county administrator and as a receiving clerk or an assistant receiving clerk for the county.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, in any county having a population of less than three thousand (3,000) according to the latest federal decennial census, the board of supervisors, with the approval of the chancery clerk, may appoint the chancery clerk also to serve as the county administrator, the county purchase clerk, an assistant purchase clerk, the receiving clerk, an assistant receiving clerk, and the inventory control clerk, or any combination of such positions.

The county administrator, under the policies determined by the board of supervisors and subject to the board’s general supervision and control, shall administer all county affairs falling under the control of the board and carry out the general policies of the board in conformity with the estimates of expenditures fixed in the annual budget as finally adopted by the board or as thereafter revised by appropriate action of the board.

The boards of supervisors of at least two (2) but no more than five (5) counties may, by agreement executed under the Interlocal Cooperation Act of 1974, employ the same person to serve them as county administrator; however, a chancery clerk may not be appointed to serve as administrator for more than one (1) county nor for any county other than the county for which he serves as chancery clerk.

The State Auditor shall prescribe a course of continuing education for county administrators to keep them knowledgeable about their duties and responsibilities with respect to administering the affairs of the county. At least one (1) training session shall be held annually.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 6, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-4-3.
Terms of employment; compensation.

[With regard to any county that is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The county administrator so employed shall hold office at the pleasure of the board of supervisors and his employment may be terminated at any time by a majority vote of the board of supervisors. He shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the board of supervisors which may be paid from the county general fund or from the proceeds of any tax levied by the board of supervisors for the support and maintenance of any unit of county government, excluding schools and hospitals, or from any funds which may be available to defray the financial administration expenses of county government. The board shall provide travel and transportation expense and other office expenses as are needed in the performance of the duties of the office of county administrator. Said travel and transportation expense shall be paid on itemized vouchers in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 7, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-4-3.
Terms of employment; compensation.

[With regard to any county that is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The person appointed as county administrator under Section 19-4-1 shall serve at the will and pleasure of the board of supervisors and may be removed from such position by a majority vote of the board. The compensation of the county administrator shall be fixed by the board of supervisors and may be paid from the county general fund or from any funds which may be available to defray the financial administration expenses of county government. Any chancery clerk who agrees to also serve as county administrator may be paid, in addition to such compensation as he is otherwise entitled to receive by law, such additional compensation as the board deems him to be entitled commensurate with the additional duties he performs as county administrator. The board shall provide travel and transportation expense and other office expenses as are needed in the performance of the duties of the office of county administrator. Said travel and transportation expense shall be paid on itemized vouchers in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 7, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-4-5.
Establishment of administration policies by board.

The board of supervisors by action spread upon the minutes shall establish the general policies to be followed in the administration of the county and the county administrator so employed shall have such duties and responsibilities as set forth in sections 19-4-1 through 19-4-9.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 486, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 19-4-7.
Duties and responsibilities.

[With regard to any county that is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors may delegate and assign to the county administrator the duties and responsibilities enumerated below, in whole or in part, and such other duties and responsibilities as said board may determine, not contrary to the laws of the State of Mississippi or the Constitution thereof and not assigned by law to other officers:

Employ an office clerk and such other technical and secretarial assistance for the board as may be needed, maintain an office for the board and prepare a budget for his office subject to approval of the board;

Prepare an inventory of all personal property owned by the county and the location and condition of such property and shall maintain a perpetual inventory of such property;

List all buildings and real estate owned by the county and keep a perpetual list of such real estate;

Be responsible for carrying out the responsibilities of the board of supervisors in regard to janitorial services and maintenance of buildings and property owned by the county except such as may be specifically assigned by the board of supervisors to some other person or office, or may be the responsibility of some other office under law;

Exercise supervision over the purchase clerk and inventory control clerk of the county, and the boards or other divisions of county government financed in whole or in part through taxes levied on county property and purchases shall be made from vendors whose bids have been accepted by the board of supervisors under the provisions of law or to serve as purchase clerk or inventory control clerk;

Assist the board in the preparation of the budget and preparation of the tax levy;

Have authority to make inquiry of any person or group using county funds appropriated by the board of supervisors as to the use or proper use of such funds and shall report to the board of supervisors as to such findings;

Have general supervision over the county sanitary land fills and refuse collection procedures;

Have general supervision over county-owned parks, playgrounds and recreation areas;

Have general supervision over any and all zoning and building code ordinances adopted by the board of supervisors and shall administer such ordinances;

Have general supervision over any and all airports owned by the county;

Be the liaison officer to work with the various divisions of county government and agencies to see that county-owned property is properly managed, maintained, repaired, improved, kept or stored;

See that all orders, resolutions and regulations of the board of supervisors are faithfully executed;

Make reports to the board from time to time concerning the affairs of the county and keep the board fully advised as to the financial condition of the county and future financial needs;

Keep the board of supervisors informed as to federal and state laws and regulations which affect the board of supervisors and the county, shall advise the board as to the possible availability of federal or state grants and assistance for which the county may be eligible, shall assist in the preparation and submission of plans and project specifications necessary to acquire such assistance, and shall be the administrating officer of county grants from state and federal sources;

Be charged with the responsibility of securing insurance coverage on such county property as the board shall decide should be insured and of securing any other insurance required or authorized by law. He shall work out a plan of insurance for the county which will insure minimum premiums;

Receive inquiries and complaints from citizens of the county as to the operation of county government, investigate such inquiries and complaints and shall report his finding to the board and the individual supervisor of the district from which such inquiry or complaint arises;

Meet regularly with the board of supervisors and have full privileges of discussion but no vote;

Do any and all other administrative duties that the board of supervisors could legally do themselves and that they can legally delegate without violating the laws of the state nor impinging upon the duties set out by law for other officers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 486, § 4; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 8, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-4-7.
Duties and responsibilities.

[With regard to any county that is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The board of supervisors may delegate and assign to the county administrator the duties and responsibilities enumerated below, in whole or in part, and such other duties and responsibilities as said board may determine, not contrary to the laws of the State of Mississippi or the Constitution thereof and not assigned by law to other officers:

Employ an office clerk and such other technical and secretarial assistance for the board as may be needed, maintain an office for the board and prepare a budget for his office subject to approval of the board;

Be responsible for carrying out the policies adopted by the board of supervisors;

Exercise supervision over the boards or other divisions of county government, except for the sheriff’s department, financed in whole or in part through taxes levied on county property and purchases shall be made from vendors whose bids have been accepted by the board of supervisors under the provisions of law;

Prepare the budget for consideration by the board of supervisors and assist the board of supervisors in the preparation of the tax levy; however, the sheriff, any governing authority, as defined in Section 31-7-1, funded in whole or in part by the board of supervisors and any board or commission funded in whole or in part by the board of supervisors shall be responsible for preparing their respective budgets for consideration by the board of supervisors;

Make inquiry of any person or group using county funds appropriated by the board of supervisors as to the use or proper use of such funds and shall report to the board of supervisors as to such findings;

Have general supervision over the county sanitary landfills and refuse collection procedures;

Have general supervision over county-owned parks, playgrounds and recreation areas;

Have general supervision over any and all zoning and building code ordinances adopted by the board of supervisors and shall administer such ordinances;

Have general supervision over any and all airports owned by the county;

Be the liaison officer to work with the various divisions of county government and agencies to see that county-owned property is properly managed, maintained, repaired, improved, kept or stored;

See that all orders, resolutions and regulations of the board of supervisors are faithfully executed;

Make reports to the board from time to time concerning the affairs of the county and keep the board fully advised as to the financial condition of the county and future financial needs;

Keep the board of supervisors informed as to federal and state laws and regulations which affect the board of supervisors and the county, shall advise the board as to the possible availability of federal or state grants and assistance for which the county may be eligible, shall assist in the preparation and submission of plans and project specifications necessary to acquire such assistance, and shall be the administrating officer of county grants from state and federal sources;

Be charged with the responsibility of securing insurance coverage on such county property as the board shall decide should be insured and of securing any other insurance required or authorized by law. He shall work out a plan of insurance for the county which will ensure minimum premiums;

Receive inquiries and complaints from citizens of the county as to the operation of county government, investigate such inquiries and complaints, and shall report his finding to the board and the individual supervisor of the district from which such inquiry or complaint arises;

Meet regularly with the board of supervisors and have full privileges of discussion but no vote;

Perform any and all other administrative duties that the board of supervisors could legally perform themselves and that they can legally delegate without violating the laws of the state nor impinging upon the duties set out by law for other officers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 486, § 4; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 8, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 19-4-9.
Oath and bond.

The county administrator shall take the official oath of office and shall give bond to the board of supervisors, with sufficient surety, to be payable, conditioned and approved as provided by law, in a penalty equal to three percent (3%) of the sum of all the state and county taxes shown by the assessment rolls and the levies to have been collectible in the county for the year immediately preceding the commencement of the term of office for such administrator; however, such bond shall not exceed the amount of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00). The bond premiums shall be paid from the county general fund or other available funds of the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 486, § 5; Laws, 1986, ch. 458, § 16; Laws, 1991, ch. 604, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1991.